Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2084.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding an article to read:SECTION 1. SECTION 2003-H(A) AND (D) OF THE ACT OF MARCH 10, 1949 (P.L.30, NO.14), KNOWN AS THE PUBLIC SCHOOL CODE OF 1949, ARE AMENDED AND SUBSECTION (B) IS AMENDED BY ADDING A PARAGRAPH TO READ:SECTION 2003-H. COMPARISON TOOL.(A) DUTY OF DEPARTMENT.--[IF THE UNITED STATES DEPARTMENT OF <--<--<--12345678910111213141516171819 EDUCATION DISCONTINUES THE PUBLICATION OF THE COLLEGE NAVIGATOR WEBSITE, THE] THE DEPARTMENT SHALL MAKE AVAILABLE ON THE DEPARTMENT'S PUBLICLY ACCESSIBLE INTERNET WEBSITE A SEARCH TOOL THAT ALLOWS AN INDIVIDUAL TO COMPARE INSTITUTIONS OF HIGHER EDUCATION THAT MEET CERTAIN CRITERIA SELECTED BY THE INDIVIDUAL, INCLUDING THE OFFERING OF A PARTICULAR MAJOR OR PROGRAM OF STUDY.(B) REQUIREMENTS.--THE COMPARISON TOOL REQUIRED UNDER THIS SECTION MUST:* * *(4.1) ALLOW A USER TO IDENTIFY AND COMPARE HIGH PRIORITY OCCUPATIONS IN THIS COMMONWEALTH. THE INFORMATION UNDER THIS PARAGRAPH SHALL BE SEARCHABLE BY COUNTY AND INCLUDE INFORMATION ON EDUCATIONAL ATTAINMENT, WAGES AND EMPLOYMENT DEMAND.* * *(D) DUTY OF INSTITUTIONS.--[IF THE DEPARTMENT IS REQUIRED TO DEVELOP THE COMPARISON TOOL UNDER SUBSECTION (A), EACH] EACH INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION SHALL PROVIDE THE INFORMATION LISTED IN THIS SECTION, AS AVAILABLE, TO THE DEPARTMENT NOT LATER THAN JANUARY 1 OF EACH YEAR. IF THE INFORMATION REQUIRED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION IS AVAILABLE IN AN INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION'S INTEGRATED POSTSECONDARY EDUCATION DATA SYSTEM REPORT, THE INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION MAY COMPLY WITH THE REPORTING REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SUBSECTION BY SENDING AN ELECTRONIC COPY OF THE INTEGRATED POSTSECONDARY EDUCATION DATA SYSTEM REPORT TO THE DEPARTMENT. THE DEPARTMENT SHALL UPDATE THE COMPARISON TOOL AS SOON AS PRACTICABLE AFTER RECEIVING INFORMATION FROM EACH INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION.* * *20250HB2084PN3588 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 SECTION 2. THE ACT IS AMENDED BY ADDING AN ARTICLE TO READ:ARTICLE XX-NPENNSYLVANIA PROMISE PROGRAMSection 2001-N. Scope of article.This article relates to the Pennsylvania Promise Program.Section 2002-N. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Academic year." A 12-month period commencing on or after August 1 of the calendar year."Agency." The Pennsylvania Higher Education Assistance Agency."Community college." An institution created under Article XIX-A or the act of August 24, 1963 (P.L.1132, No.484), known as the Community College Act of 1963."Eligible adult learner." An individual who:(1) Is a resident of this Commonwealth at the time of application to the agency for aid to assist with reeducation programs under section 2008-N.(2) Has been a domiciled resident of this Commonwealth as determined by the agency.(3) Is 24 25 years of age or older at the time of application to the agency for aid to assist with reeducation programs under section 2008-N.(4) Has graduated from high school or an equivalent approved by the Department of Education.(5) Has applied for and been accepted to an institution of higher education.(6) Has completed a THE Free Application for Federal 20250HB2084PN3588 - 3 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Student Aid BY THE DEADLINE SET BY THE AGENCY . (7) HAS COMPLETED THE APPLICATION FOR THE STATE SCHOLARSHIP PROGRAM ADMINISTERED BY THE AGENCY UNDER THE ACT OF JANUARY 25, 1966 (1965 P.L.1546, NO.541), REFERRED TO AS THE HIGHER EDUCATION SCHOLARSHIP LAW.(7) (8) Has applied for all available RELEVANT Federal grants, State grants and institution grants."Eligible student." An individual who:(1) Is a resident of this Commonwealth at the time of application to the agency for a scholarship under section 2006-N or 2007-N.(2) Has been a domiciled resident of this Commonwealth as determined by the agency.(3) Is less than 24 25 years of age or is an active member of a branch of the armed services at the time of application to the agency for a scholarship under section 2006-N or 2007-N.(4) Has graduated from high school or an equivalent approved by the Department of Education within the previous five years.(5) Has applied for and been accepted to an institution of higher education.(6) Has completed a Free Application for Federal Student Aid.(7) Has applied for all available Federal grants, State grants and institution grants."Fees." Fixed MANDATORY FIXED charges to recover costs of certain services, materials or activities provided. Fees may not exceed the highest MANDATORY fixed charges set by the Board of Governors of the State System of Higher Education A STATE-OWNED 20250HB2084PN3588 - 4 - <--<--<--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 INSTITUTION . "Full-time student." An individual enrolled in an undergraduate degree program at an institution of higher education and registered for a minimum of 12 credits per semester or equivalent enrollment as set by the agency."Fund." The Pennsylvania Promise Program Fund established under section 2005-N."HOUSING AND FOOD." THE STANDARD EDUCATIONAL EXPENSE ALLOWANCE FOR ROOM AND BOARD FOR THE MOST RECENT YEAR AS DETERMINED BY THE AGENCY."Independent institution of higher education." An institution operated not for profit, located in and incorporated or chartered by the Commonwealth and entitled to confer degrees as specified in 24 Pa.C.S. § 6505 (relating to power to confer degrees) and to apply itself the designation "college" or "university" as provided for by the standards and qualifications prescribed by the State Board of Education under 24 Pa.C.S. Ch. 65 (relating to private colleges, universities and seminaries)."Institution of higher education." Any of the following:(1) A community college.(2) A State-owned institution.(3) A State-related institution.(4) The Thaddeus Stevens College of Technology.(5) An independent institution of higher education."Part-time student." An individual enrolled in an institution of higher education and registered for less than 12 credits per semester or equivalent enrollment as set by the agency."Program." The Pennsylvania Promise Program established under this article.20250HB2084PN3588 - 5 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Room and board." The standard educational expense allowance for the most recent year as determined by the agency."Scholarship for room and board HOUSING AND FOOD ." A scholarship for room and board HOUSING AND FOOD awarded by the agency under section 2007-N."Scholarship for tuition and fees." A scholarship for tuition and fees awarded under section 2006-N."State-owned institution." An institution which is part of the State System of Higher Education under Article XX-A and all branches and campuses of the institution."State-related institution." The Pennsylvania State University, Pennsylvania College of Technology, University of Pittsburgh, Temple University, Lincoln University and associated branch campuses of the universities."Tuition." An amount not to exceed the maximum FLAT, FULL- TIME, ANNUAL, undergraduate in-State tuition rate established by the Board of Governors of the State System of Higher Education for rendering educational services, as enumerated in Article XX-A. The agency, at its discretion, may increase the maximum amount.Section 2003-N. Pennsylvania Promise Program.The Pennsylvania Promise Program is established within the agency.Section 2004-N. Procedure.(a) Agency.--The agency shall administer the program and carry out this article.(b) Regulations.--The agency may promulgate regulations necessary to administer this article.(C) AVAILABILITY.--THE AGENCY SHALL MAKE AWARDS UNDER THIS ARTICLE BEGINNING IN THE 2027-2028 FISCAL YEAR SUBJECT TO 20250HB2084PN3588 - 6 - <--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 AVAILABLE MONEY IN THE FUND.Section 2005-N. Pennsylvania Promise Program Fund.(a) Fund.--The Pennsylvania Promise Program Fund is established in the State Treasury.(b) Administration of fund.--Money in the fund is appropriated to the agency on an ongoing basis to carry out this article.(c) Contributions and investment.--(1) The fund may accept gifts, donations, legacies or any other revenues.(2) Interest earned by the fund shall remain in the fund.(d) Purpose.--Money in the fund shall be used for the purposes stated in this article.(e) Nonlapsing.--Money in the fund shall not lapse and shall be available in subsequent fiscal years to be used in accordance with the provisions of this article.(f) Reallocation.--The agency may allocate money from the fund to eligible students attending an institution of higher education in accordance with sections 2006-N and 2007-N IF THE INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION MEETS THE REQUIREMENTS OF SECTION 2010-N . (g) Administrative costs.--The agency may, for program administration, utilize the lesser of 5% or the actual costs to the agency from money available in the fund for that fiscal year.Section 2006-N. Scholarship for tuition and fees.(a) Application.-- Subject to available money in the fund, the agency shall accept applications, in a form and manner as determined by the agency, from eligible students for a 20250HB2084PN3588 - 7 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 scholarship for tuition and fees as provided in this section.(b) Scholarship at State-owned , State-related or independent institution of higher education.--An eligible student may receive a scholarship for tuition and fees at a State-owned institution, State-related institution or independent institution of higher education for the academic year. The amount of the scholarship may not exceed the lesser of the maximum undergraduate in-State tuition rate established by the Board of Governors of the State System of Higher Education for rendering educational services as enumerated in Article XX- A TU ITION , or the outstanding tuition and fees after Federal, State and institution grants have been applied, if the eligible student:(1) has a total annual household income that does not exceed $250,000 subject to the adjustment in section 2009-N; and(2) is enrolled full time.(c) Scholarship at community college or the Thaddeus Stevens College of Technology .--An eligible student may receive a scholarship at a community college or the Thaddeus Stevens College of Technology for the academic year in an amount not to exceed the outstanding tuition and fees after Federal, State and institution grants have been applied if, at a minimum, the eligible student is enrolled full time.(d) Review and approval.--(1) The agency shall review all applications submitted under this section.(2) The agency may approve an application if the application meets the requirements under subsection (b) or (c) and if the eligible student submitting the application 20250HB2084PN3588 - 8 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 meets the requirements of this article.(e) Distribution of scholarship.--Once an eligible student has been approved for a scholarship for tuition and fees, the agency shall, upon receipt of an outstanding balance from an institution of higher education, pay the outstanding tuition and fee balance owed by the eligible student directly to the institution of higher education.(f) Limitation on scholarship.--Notwithstanding any provision of this act to the contrary, the agency may not issue a scholarship in excess of the outstanding balance for tuition and fees received from an institution of higher education.(g) Renewal.--(1) The scholarship for tuition and fees may not exceed one academic year.(2) The agency shall create an application to allow previously approved eligible students to recertify their eligibility.(3) An eligible student at a State-owned institution , State-related institution or independent institution of higher education who has not exceeded the limitation in subsection (i) may reapply for the scholarship for tuition and fees if the eligible student:(i) Is enrolled full time.(ii) Is making satisfactory academic progress as determined by the institution of higher education, unless the eligible student is in the first year of college.(iii) While attending a State-owned institution , State-related institution or independent institution of higher education , has a total annual household income that does not exceed $250,000 subject to the adjustment 20250HB2084PN3588 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 in section 2009-N.(4) An eligible student at a community college or the Thaddeus Stevens College of Technology who has not exceeded the limitation in subsection (i) may reapply for the scholarship for tuition and fees if the eligible student:(i) Is enrolled full time or part time.(ii) Is making satisfactory academic progress, unless the eligible student is in the first year of college.(h) Continued eligibility.--An eligible student must be continuously enrolled in the institution of higher education for the academic year which the eligible student received a scholarship for tuition and fees. If the eligible student is not continuously enrolled in the institution of higher education, the agency, in its discretion, may deny renewal under subsection (g).(i) Limitation to scholarship.--(1) An eligible student may not receive a scholarship for tuition and fees if the eligible student:(i) While attending a community college or the Thaddeus Stevens College of Technology , has completed more than four academic years or has earned an associate's degree.(ii) While attending a State-owned institution , State-related institution or independent institution of higher education , has completed four academic years or has earned a bachelor's degree.(2) A student who is otherwise eligible for a scholarship for tuition and fees under this section may not receive a scholarship if the local sponsor, as defined under 20250HB2084PN3588 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 section 1901-A(2), reduces the amount of the payment made under section 1913-A(a) as of the effective date of this paragraph. The agency, in its sole discretion, may waive the provisions of this paragraph.(3) An eligible student may receive a scholarship for no more than four academic years at an institution of higher education.Section 2007-N. Scholarship for room and board HOUSING AND FOOD . (a) Application.-- Subject to available money in the fund, the agency shall accept applications, in a form and manner as determined by the agency, from eligible students for a scholarship for room and board HOUSING AND FOOD as provided in this section.(b) Scholarship at State-owned institution , State-related institution or independent institution of higher education .--An eligible student at a State-owned institution , State-related institution or independent institution of higher education may receive a scholarship for room and board HOUSING AND FOOD for the academic year after Federal, State and institution grants have been applied if the eligible student:(1) has a total annual household income that does not exceed $60,000 subject to the adjustment in section 2009-N; and(2) is enrolled full time.(c) Scholarship at community college or the Thaddeus Stevens College of Technology .--An eligible student at a community college or the Thaddeus Stevens College of Technology may receive a scholarship for room and board HOUSING AND FOOD for the academic year after Federal, State and institution grants 20250HB2084PN3588 - 11 - <--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 have been applied, if the eligible student:(1) has a total annual household income that does not exceed $60,000 subject to the adjustment in section 2009-N; and(2) is enrolled full time or part time.(d) Review and approval.--(1) The agency shall review all applications submitted under this section.(2) The agency may approve an application if the application meets the requirements under subsection (b) or (c) and if the eligible student meets the requirements of this article.(e) Distribution of scholarship at State-owned institution , State-related institution or independent institution of higher education .--If an eligible student has been approved for a scholarship for room and board HOUSING AND FOOD , the agency shall, upon receipt of an outstanding balance from the State-owned institution , State-related institution or independent institution of higher education , pay the outstanding balance for room and board HOUSING AND FOOD owed by the eligible student directly to the institution.(f) Distribution of scholarship at community colleges or the Thaddeus Stevens College of Technology .--If an eligible student has been approved for a scholarship for room and board HOUSING AND FOOD , the agency shall pay a scholarship for room and board HOUSING AND FOOD in a manner decided by the agency. (g) Limitation on scholarship.--(1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) and notwithstanding any provision of this act to the contrary, the agency may not issue a scholarship for room and board 20250HB2084PN3588 - 12 - <--<--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 HOUSING AND FOOD in excess of the outstanding balance received from a State-owned institution , State-related institution or independent AN institution of higher education . (2) The agency may issue a scholarship for room and board in excess of the outstanding balance received from a community college or the Thaddeus Stevens College of Technology . HOUSING AND FOOD FOR ELIGIBLE STUDENTS ATTENDING A COMMUNITY COLLEGE AS AN AWARD FOR SPECIFIC LIVING EXPENSES APPROVED BY THE AGENCY IN AN AMOUNT DETERMINED BY THE AGENCY.(3) A student who is otherwise eligible for a scholarship for tuition and fees under this section may not receive a scholarship if the local sponsor, as defined under section 1901-A(2), reduces the amount of the payment made under section 1913-A(a) as of the effective date of this paragraph. The agency, in its sole discretion, may waive the provisions of this paragraph.(h) Renewal.--(1) A scholarship for room and board HOUSING AND FOOD may not exceed one academic year.(2) The agency shall create an application to allow previously approved eligible students to recertify the eligible student's eligibility.(3) An eligible student who has not exceeded the limitation in subsection (j) may reapply for the scholarship for room and board HOUSING AND FOOD if the student is enrolled full time at a State-owned institution , State- related institution or independent institution of higher education or is enrolled full time or part time at a community college and:20250HB2084PN3588 - 13 - <--<--<--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (i) is making satisfactory academic progress as determined by the institution of higher education, unless the eligible student is in the first year of college; and(ii) has a total annual household income that does not exceed $60,000 subject to the adjustment in section 2009-N.(i) Continued eligibility.--An eligible student must be continuously enrolled in the institution of higher education for the academic year for which the eligible student received a scholarship for room and board HOUSING AND FOOD . If an eligible student is not continuously enrolled in the institution of higher education, the agency, in its discretion, may deny renewal under subsection (h).(j) Limitation to eligibility.--(1) An eligible student may not receive a scholarship for room and board HOUSING AND FOOD if the eligible student: (i) Except as provided in paragraph (2), has completed four academic years or has earned an associate's degree while attending a community college or the Thaddeus Stevens College of Technology . (ii) Has completed four academic years or has earned a bachelor's degree while attending a State-owned institution , State-related institution or independent institution of higher education . (2) An eligible student may receive a scholarship for two academic years at a State-owned institution , State- related institution or independent institution of higher education if eligibility under paragraph (1)(i) has been exhausted.Section 2008-N. Aid for adult reeducation.20250HB2084PN3588 - 14 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (a) Application.-- Subject to available money in the fund, the agency shall accept applications, in a form and manner as determined by the agency, from an eligible adult learner for aid for adult reeducation.(b) Eligibility.--An eligible adult learner may receive assistance for aid for adult reeducation programs for the academic year if the eligible adult learner:(1) has a total annual household income that does not exceed $250,000 subject to the adjustment in section 2009-N; and(2) has applied for and been accepted into an adult reeducation program or adult reeducation certificate program, or is enrolled full time or part time in an institution of higher education.(c) Pennsylvania Targeted Industry Cluster Certificate Scholarship Program.--The agency may use money allocated for adult reeducation for the Pennsylvania Targeted Industry Cluster Certificate Scholarship Program.(d) Review and approval.--(1) The agency shall review all applications submitted under this section.(2) The agency may approve an application if the application meets the requirements under subsection (b) and if the eligible adult learner meets the requirements of this section.(e) Priority.--When reviewing an application for aid under this section, the agency shall prioritize aid for programs that lead to an industry-recognized credential that is articulated with college credit. The agency shall annually determine and post on its publicly accessible Internet website industry-20250HB2084PN3588 - 15 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 recognized credentialed programs which qualify for aid priority under this section.(f) Distribution of aid.--If an eligible adult learner has been approved for aid under this section, the agency shall, upon receipt of an outstanding balance from an institution of higher education, pay the outstanding balance owed by an adult learner directly to the institution of higher education.(g) Limitation on aid.--Notwithstanding any provision of this act, the agency may not issue any aid in excess of the outstanding balance received from an institution of higher education.(h) Renewal.--(1) Aid awarded to an eligible adult learner shall not exceed one academic year.(2) The agency shall create an application to allow previously approved eligible adult learners to recertify their eligibility.(3) An eligible adult learner who has not exceeded the limitation in subsection (i) may reapply for aid if the eligible adult learner:(i) Is enrolled full time or part time at an institution of higher education or a certificate program approved by the agency.(ii) Has a total annual household income that does not exceed $250,000 subject to the adjustment in section 2009-N.(i) Limitation to eligibility.--An eligible adult learner may not receive aid if the eligible adult learner:(1) has completed more than four academic years while attending a community college;20250HB2084PN3588 - 16 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) has earned an associate's degree while attending a community college; or (3) has completed an industry-recognized credential for which the eligible adult learner was enrolled in order to qualify for aid . ; OR (4) has completed four academic years or has earned a bachelor's degree while attending a State-owned institution , State-related institution or independent institution of higher education ; or . (5) has completed an industry-recognized credential for which the eligible adult learner was enrolled in order to qualify for aid.Section 2009-N. Annual income adjustment.(a) CPI percentage change.--(1) The household income limits under this article shall be increased by a percentage equal to the percentage change in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers statistics published by the United States Bureau of Labor Statistics. Any increase shall be rounded to the nearest $10. The percentage change shall be determined by comparison of the figure for the previous July, with that of the current July figure. If the Consumer Price Index declines for a given period, the household income limits under this article shall be unchanged for that year. (2) The agency shall, within 10 days following the determination under paragraph (1), transmit notice of the determination to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin.(b) Coordination of programs.--Notwithstanding any provision 20250HB2084PN3588 - 17 - <--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 of law to the contrary, the agency shall coordinate efforts between programs administered by the agency in order to maximize benefits to eligible students and to ensure an effective and efficient use of Commonwealth funds.(c) Uniform application.--To the extent possible, the agency shall develop a single application for programs administered by the agency to maximize the coordination of programs required under subsection (b).SECTION 2010-N. ELIGIBILITY REQUIREMENTS FOR INSTITUTIONS OF HIGHER EDUCATION.IN ORDER TO BE ELIGIBLE TO RECEIVE FUNDING UNDER THIS ARTICLE, AN INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION MUST COMPLY WITH SECTION 2003-H.Section 2010-N 2011-N . Annual report. Beginning one year after the first scholarship is awarded under this article, the agency shall provide the Governor, the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of the Senate, the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of the House of Representatives, the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Education Committee of the Senate and the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Education Committee of the House of Representatives with a report which includes the following:(1) The total number of students served by the program.(2) A breakdown by race, gender, ethnicity and socioeconomic demographic for all students served by the program, if known.(3) The total number of scholarships awarded and the average amount awarded.(4) A year-over-year comparison of the net total costs 20250HB2084PN3588 - 18 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 at all institutions of higher education in this Commonwealth which shall be used to evaluate the adequacy and success of the program in lowering college costs.(5) Recommendations, if any, for improving access and affordability of higher education.(6) A breakdown of the institutions attended by eligible students in the program.(7) A breakdown of the majors in which the eligible students in the program are enrolled.(8) Any other information.Section 2 3. This act shall take effect immediately. AS FOLLOWS:(1) THE AMENDMENT OR ADDITION OF SECTION 2003-H(A), (B)(4.1) AND (D) OF THE ACT SHALL TAKE EFFECT IN 60 DAYS.(2) THE REMAINDER OF THIS ACT SHALL TAKE EFFECT IMMEDIATELY.20250HB2084PN3588 - 19 - <--12345678910111213141516